lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VAIO_Class=VAIO_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:siidogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:siidogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj:siidogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObvSubj:siidogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProxSubj:siidog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+XSubj:siimwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:siigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:siigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:siigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+3SgObvObj:siigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj:siinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:siinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:siinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj:siigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:siigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:siigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj+3SgObvObj:siigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:siiwa' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:siiwan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj:siiwag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj:siiwan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj:sii EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj:siin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+XSubj:siim EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:siibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:siibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:siibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObvSubj:siibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProxSubj:siiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+XSubj:siimwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:dogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:dogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj:dogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObvSubj:dogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProxSubj:dog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+XSubj:mwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:gwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj:gwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj:gwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+3SgObvObj:gwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj:nigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj:nigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj:nigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj:goban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj:goban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj+%0SgObj:goban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj+3SgObvObj:goban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:wa' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:wan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj:wag EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj:wan EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj:w1 EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj:m EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:banii' EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:baniig EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj:ban EncliticRoot ;
+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Prt+XSubj:mwaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI                                                        !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Prefix
@P.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@:@P.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@%<ChCnj%> VAI_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.GI@:@P.Prefix.GI@gi VAI_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NI@:@P.Prefix.NI@ni VAI_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI                                                        !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreverbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI                                                        !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary
0:%>%> VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_am                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_am                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_am_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAI_Class=VAI_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_am, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Stems
aagonwetam:aagonwet VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
aandendam:aandend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
aanizhiitam:aanizhiit VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
aayaagonwetam:aayaagonwet VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
aazhawaakwa'am:aazhawaakwa' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
agadendam:agadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
anaamendam:anaamend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
andawendam:nandawend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
andotam:nandot VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
animwewidam:animwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
ayagadendam:ayagadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
ayindoodam:ayindood VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
baaboonam:baaboon VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
baapaganaandam:baapaganaand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
baashkakwa'am:baashkakwa' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
babaamanaandam:babaamanaand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
babaamwewidam:babaamwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
babegikaadendam:babegikaadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
babizindam:babizind VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bagakitam:bagakit VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bagamwewidam:bagamwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bajiba'am:bajiba' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
banaadendam:banaadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bapiinitam:bapiinit VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bawishkam:bawishk VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bezhigookam:bezhigook VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
biidanaandam:biidanaand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
biigiskaadendam:biigiskaadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
biigizawinam:biigizawin VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
biisa'am:biisa' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bimwewidam:bimwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bishigendam:bishigend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
boonam:boon VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
boonwewidam:boonwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
bwaawidam:bwaawid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
dakendam:dakend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
danamandam:danamand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
debisewendam:debisewend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
debwewidam:debwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
dibishkam:dibishk VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gaawendam:gaawend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gagashkendam:gagashkend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gagiibaazaabandam:gagiibaazaaband VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gagwaadagendam:gagwaadagend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gagwayakwendam:gagwayakwend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gashkiidibikinam:gashkiidibikin VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gawendam:gawend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gegezikwendam:gegezikwend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gibikam:gibik VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
giikaawidam:giikaawid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
giiwashkwenaandam:giiwashkwenaand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
giiwashkweyendam:giiwashkweyend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
giizhendam:giizhend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gikendam:gikend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gizhiiwewidam:gizhiiwewid VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
googa'am:googa' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
goshkwaawaadendam:goshkwaawaadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gwayakotam:gwayakot VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
gwiinawi-doodam:gwiinawi-dood VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
ina'am:ina' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
inanaandam:inanaand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
initam:init VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
izhinam:izhin VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
jiigewe'am:jiigewe' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maa'ishkam:maa'ishk VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maajii'am:maajii' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maameshkodendam:maameshkodend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maamoojigendam:maamoojigend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maanendam:maanend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maazhendam:maazhend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
mamaanitam:mamaanit VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
mamiidaawendam:mamiidaawend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
maminaadendam:maminaadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
mamizhodam:mamizhod VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
mayagendam:mayagend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
migoshkaadendam:migoshkaadend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
mikwendam:mikwend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
minotam:minot VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
misawendam:misawend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
moojigendam:moojigend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
na'endam:na'end VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
naanaagazotam:naanaagazot VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
nanaa'endam:nanaa'end VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
nanaapaazitam:nanaapaazit VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
naniizaanendam:naniizaanend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
nimitaama'am:nimitaama' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
nita'am:nita' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
ojaanimendam:ojaanimend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
ondamendam:ondamend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
onendam:onend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
ozosodam:ozosod VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
wanitam:wanit VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
wawizhendam:wawizhend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
zaaga'am:zaaga' VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
zegendam:zegend VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
zhiibanaandam:zhiibanaand VAI_Class=VAI_am_Boundary ;
